Louisiana, session 2026, HB233.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:3049(B)(1)(b) and 3053 are hereby amended and reenacted to
read as follows:
§3049. Cash deposit; bond; duty to attend; compensation; procedure; filing fees
* * *
B.(1)
* * *
(b) The compensation shall be twenty-five dollars for each day of attendance
in court, and the mileage allowance shall be not less than sixteen cents per mile nor
more than the rate in effect for state officials an amount equal to the rate in effect for
state officials for each mile necessarily traveled in going to and returning from the
courthouse.
* * *
§3053. Compensation of jury commissioners
All jury commissioners are entitled to recover compensation at the rate of
seventy-five dollars per day during actual attendance at meetings and an additional
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 233 ENROLLED
fee of not less than twenty-one cents per mile nor more than the rate in effect for
state officials for each mile going to and returning from their place of meeting.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.